Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Chapter 13. Mississippi Administrative Reorganization Act

§ 7-13-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be cited as the “Mississippi Administrative Reorganization Act of 1984.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 7-13-3.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of this chapter to provide that the Governor and the executive branch of the government of the state of Mississippi shall have full authority to execute the laws of Mississippi and to administer and manage the affairs of state government in accordance with the Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

Provided, however, nothing in this chapter is intended to reduce in any manner the authority of the legislature to appropriate funds or to specify the means by which such funds are to be expended.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 7-13-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§7-13-5. [En Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 3]

§ 7-13-7.
Transfer of employees.

Effective July 1, 1984, all employees of any agency abolished or affected by this chapter shall be transferred according to the merger of their duties by this chapter. All such transfers shall be in accordance with the rules and regulations of the state personnel board.

It is the intent of the legislature that the number of persons employed by the state as the result of the consolidation required by this chapter shall be reduced where possible, but it is the intent of the legislature that such reduction shall result from attrition of employees and not dismissal.

All records, personnel, property and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations or other funds of any agency abolished or affected by this chapter shall be transferred to the appropriate agency according to the merger of their functions under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 7-13-9.
Change of domicil affecting membership on board, commission, council or authority.

Any member of any board, commission, council or authority reconstituted under this chapter shall be deemed to have vacated his position thereon if he changes his domicile to another state or to a geographical area other than the one from which he was appointed if the statute specified that he shall be appointed from such designated geographical area. Provided, however, that this section shall not apply in the event the member was appointed from a district the boundaries of which have been altered by statute or court order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 332, eff from and after July 1, 1984.